Colorado, session 2026A, HB1357.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-108.5, repeal
(7); and add (9), (10), and (11) as follows:
22-35-108.5. Teacher recruitment education and preparation
(TREP) program - objectives - selection criteria - rules - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(7) On or before July 1, 2031, the department shall prepare and
submit to the education committees of the senate and house of
representatives, or any successor committees, a report concerning the
outcomes achieved by the TREP program and the effectiveness of the TREP
program in meeting the objectives described in section 22-35-108.5 (1).
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

Based on the outcomes achieved and the evaluation of effectiveness, the
department shall include in the report a recommendation as to whether the
TREP program should be continued, amended, or repealed.
(9) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT DESIGNATE A QUALIFIED STUDENT AS A TREP
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT FOR THE 2027-28 STATE FISCAL YEAR OR FOR ANY
STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.
(10) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SEVEN HUNDRED NINETY-NINE THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS FROM
THE ELECTRIFYING SCHOOL BUSES GRANT PROGRAM CASH FUND, CREATED
IN SECTION 25-7-1405 (1), TO THE STATE EDUCATION FUND.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT, FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 17 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION,
PROVIDING FUNDING FOR THE TREP PROGRAM IS A PROGRAM FOR
ACCOUNTABLE EDUCATION REFORM AND A PROGRAM FOR PERFORMANCE
INCENTIVES FOR TEACHERS AND THEREFORE MAY RECEIVE FUNDING FROM
THE STATE EDUCATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 17 (4) OF ARTICLE IX OF
THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(11) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-103.5, add (8)(d)
as follows:
22-54-103.5. District total program - rules - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(8) District extended high school funding.
(d) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (8)(a) AND (8)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, FOR THE 2026-27 BUDGET YEAR, THE DOLLAR AMOUNT THAT IS
MULTIPLIED BY THE NUMBER OF FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT STUDENTS
INCLUDED IN THE DISTRICT'S HIGH SCHOOL PUPIL ENROLLMENT WHO ARE THE
DISTRICT'S TREP PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS IS SEVEN THOUSAND ONE
HUNDRED FOUR DOLLARS ($7,104).
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (8)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-104, add (4.7)(f)
as follows:
22-54-104. District total program - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(4.7) (f) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (4.7)(a) AND (4.7)(d)
OF THIS SECTION, FOR THE 2026-27 BUDGET YEAR, THE DOLLAR AMOUNT
THAT IS MULTIPLIED BY THE NUMBER OF FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT STUDENTS
INCLUDED IN THE DISTRICT'S HIGH SCHOOL PUPIL ENROLLMENT WHO ARE THE
DISTRICT'S TREP PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS IS SEVEN THOUSAND ONE
HUNDRED FOUR DOLLARS ($7,104).
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (4.7)(f) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-30.5-112.2, amend
as it will become effective July 1, 2026, (2)(b); and repeal (1)(f) as
follows:
22-30.5-112.2. Charter schools - at-risk supplemental aid -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(f) "TREP program" means the teacher recruitment education and
preparation program created in section 22-35-108.5.
(2) (b) (I) Each qualifying school district must receive at-risk
supplemental aid if the percentage of at-risk pupils in a district charter
school authorized by the qualifying school district prior to July 1, 2004, is
less than the percentage of at-risk pupils in the qualifying school district.
The amount of the school district's at-risk supplemental aid is equal to the
difference between one hundred percent of district per pupil revenues and
one hundred percent of adjusted district per pupil revenues for each pupil
enrolled in the district charter school, not including online pupils. or pupils
enrolled in the TREP program.
(II) Each district charter school in a qualifying school district that
was initially authorized prior to July 1, 2004, must receive at-risk
supplemental aid if the percentage of at-risk students in the district charter
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

school exceeds the percentage of at-risk pupils in the qualifying school
district. The amount of the district charter school's at-risk supplemental aid
is equal to the difference between one hundred percent of adjusted district
per pupil revenues and one hundred percent of district per pupil revenues
for each pupil enrolled in the district charter school, not including online
pupils. or pupils enrolled in the TREP program. A school district shall pass
through one hundred percent of a district charter school's at-risk
supplemental aid to the district charter school.
(III) Each district charter school in a school district that is not a
qualifying district and whose percentage of at-risk pupils exceeds the
percentage of at-risk pupils in the chartering school district must receive
at-risk supplemental aid. The amount of the district charter school's at-risk
supplemental aid is equal to the difference between one hundred percent of
adjusted district per pupil revenues and one hundred percent of district per
pupil revenues for each pupil enrolled in the district charter school, not
including online pupils. or pupils enrolled in the TREP program. A school
district shall pass through one hundred percent of a district charter school's
at-risk supplemental aid to the district charter school.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-30.5-513, amend
as it will become effective July 1, 2026, (4.5)(b) as follows:
22-30.5-513. Institute charter schools - funding - at-risk
supplemental aid - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(4.5) (b) The institute charter school's at-risk supplemental aid is
equal to one-half of the difference between one hundred percent of the
accounting district's per pupil revenues and one hundred percent of the
accounting district's adjusted per pupil revenues for each pupil enrolled in
the district charter school, not including online pupils. or pupils enrolled in
the TREP program.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-30.5-525, amend
(1) as follows:
22-30.5-525. Individual career and academic plans.
(1) Each institute charter school shall assist each student and the
student's parent or legal guardian to develop and maintain the student's
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

individual career and academic plan, referred to in this section as an
"ICAP", no later than the beginning of ninth grade but may assist the
student and the student's parent or legal guardian to develop and maintain
the student's ICAP in any grade prior to ninth grade. In assisting a student
and his or her parent or legal guardian in creating and maintaining the
ICAP, the institute charter school shall, at a minimum, discuss with the
student and parent or legal guardian the various career pathways created
pursuant to sections 23-60-110 and 24-46.3-104 and the types of certificates
and jobs to which each pathway leads and discuss the skills and educational
opportunities available through military enlistment. In discussing the
teaching career pathway described in section 23-60-110, each institute
charter school is encouraged to provide to the student information
concerning the TREP program created in section 22-35-108.5. In discussing
military enlistment with a student and the student's parent, each institute
charter school is encouraged to provide to the student information
concerning the military enlistment test. Each student's ICAP must comply
with the requirements specified in section 22-2-136 and the rules
promulgated by the state board of education pursuant to said section. As
part of the process of establishing the individual career and academic plan,
the student and the student's parents must be made aware of the importance
of completing the free application for federal student aid or the Colorado
application for state financial aid, or successor forms for accessing federal
and state financial aid, and be provided help in completing the forms, if
requested.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-32-109, amend
(1)(oo)(III)(B.5) as follows:
22-32-109. Board of education - specific duties - definitions.
(1) In addition to any other duty required to be performed by law,
each board of education has the following specific duties:
(oo) (III) At a minimum, each public school shall ensure that, in
developing and maintaining each student's ICAP, the counselor or teacher
explains to the student's parent or legal guardian, by electronic mail or other
written form, and to the student:
(B.5) The teaching career pathway created pursuant to section
23-60-110 AND the career opportunities to which the pathway leads; and
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

information concerning participation in the TREP program created in
section 22-35-108.5;
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-103, repeal (18)
as follows:
22-35-103. Definitions - repeal.
As used in this article 35, unless the context otherwise requires:
(18) "TREP program" means the teacher recruitment education and
preparation program created in section 22-35-108.5.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-104, amend as
it will become effective July 1, 2026, (1)(d) introductory portion as
follows:
22-35-104. Enrollment in an institution of higher education -
cooperative agreement.
(1) (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, if a qualified student is not a participant in the TREP program and
has not satisfied the minimum requirements for graduation established by
the qualified student's local education provider by the end of their
twelfth-grade year and is therefore retained by the local education provider
for additional instruction, the qualified student must not concurrently enroll
in postsecondary courses, including academic or career and technical
education courses, that may include coursework related to apprenticeship
programs or internship programs, that are worth more than a total of nine
credit hours, including gateway courses, as defined in section 23-1-113
(11)(b.5), with additional supports through supplemental academic
instruction, as defined in section 23-1-113 (11)(e). Furthermore, the
qualified student must not concurrently enroll in more than:
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-107, repeal as
it will become effective July 1, 2026, (6)(a) as follows:
22-35-107. Concurrent enrollment advisory board - created -
membership - duties - reports - repeal.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

(6) The board has the following duties:
(a) Establishing guidelines for the administration of the TREP
program pursuant to section 22-35-108.5 (4);
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-110, amend (1)
as follows:
22-35-110. Exclusions.
(1) Except for courses offered as part of the TREP program pursuant
to section 22-35-108.5, This article 35 does not apply to any course that is
offered as part of a program of off-campus instruction established pursuant
to section 23-1-109 (1) to (5).
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-113, amend as
it will become effective July 1, 2026, (1)(a) as follows:
22-35-113. Concurrent enrollment - website.
(1) By July 1, 2020, the department of education and the department
of higher education, with advice from the state board, shall make available
to the public a concurrent enrollment website to provide information to
students, parents, and legal guardians concerning concurrent enrollment
options and requirements. The departments must ensure that the website is
clear, easy to navigate, and generally user-friendly. In addition, the website
must, at a minimum:
(a) Clearly explain, differentiate, compare, and contrast concurrent
enrollment; dual enrollment programs; early college; the TREP program;
p-tech high schools, as defined in section 22-35.3-102; international
baccalaureate programs; and advanced placement courses;
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 22-35-116.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35.3-103, amend
as it will become effective July 1, 2026, (4) as follows:
22-35.3-103. Pathways in technology early college high schools
- design - requirements - approval.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

(4) A p-tech school is subject to the state assessment requirements
specified in section 22-7-1006.3 and the accountability requirements
specified in article 11 of this title 22. In addition, the commissioner and the
executive director may establish indicators for measuring the performance
of each p-tech school, which indicators may include the ability of students
who graduate from a p-tech school to obtain employment in the field or to
pursue additional postsecondary education in the field, as well as any
relevant performance indicators established for the concurrent enrollment
and TREP programs PROGRAM.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-103, amend as
it will become effective July 1, 2026, (5.2); and repeal (16) as follows:
22-54-103. Definitions - repeal.
As used in this article 54, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5.2) "District extended high school pupil enrollment" means the
number of pupils, on the pupil enrollment count day within the applicable
budget year, who are concurrently enrolled in a postsecondary course,
including an academic course or a career and technical education course, as
a participant in the TREP program and the number of pupils, on the pupil
enrollment count day within the applicable budget year, who are enrolled
in grade thirteen or fourteen in a p-tech school. A pupil enrolled in a p-tech
school pursuant to article 35.3 of this title 22 must be included in the district
extended high school pupil enrollment as a full-time student. A TREP
program participant who is enrolled in at least twelve credit hours of
postsecondary courses, including academic courses and career and technical
education courses, as of the pupil enrollment count day of the applicable
budget year must be included in the district extended high school pupil
enrollment as a full-time pupil. A TREP program participant who is
enrolled in less than twelve credit hours of postsecondary courses, including
academic courses and career and technical education courses, as of the pupil
enrollment count day of the applicable budget year must be included in the
district extended high school pupil enrollment as a part-time pupil.
(16) "TREP program" means the teacher recruitment education and
preparation program created in section 22-35-108.5.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-205, amend
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

(2)(a) as follows:
22-54-205. Sustain funding - rules - repeal.
(2) (a) A local education provider is eligible to receive
reimbursement for students who, in the preceding budget year, successfully
satisfied postsecondary credit, received an industry-recognized credential,
or satisfied work-based learning requirements as specified by state board
rule. A local education provider is eligible to receive multiple
reimbursements for one student. A local education provider is eligible for
reimbursement for students who are enrolled in a p-tech school. or
participating in a TREP program.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-60.5-209.1, repeal
(1)(a)(I) as follows:
22-60.5-209.1. Department of education - adjunct instructor
authorization - alternative teacher programs - information.
(1) (a) The department shall direct resources toward publicizing the
existence of:
(I) The teacher recruitment education and preparation program
established in section 22-35-108.5;
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 18. Appropriation to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026. Amend as added by House Bill 26-1410 section 2, Part IV (3)(A),
the affected totals, and footnote 13 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(3) SCHOOL DISTRICT OPERATIONS
(A) Public School Finance
Administration 2,645,074 2,380,153 264,921a
(17.1 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Financial Transparency System
Maintenance 97,731 97,731a
(1.0 FTE)
School Finance Audit Payments 3,000,000 3,000,000b
State Share of Districts' Total
Program Funding 5,567,435,495 4,318,686,861c 1,248,748,634d
5,567,486,133 1,248,799,272d
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
Extended High School13 4,084,701 4,084,701a
3,180,451 3,180,451a
District Per Pupil
Reimbursements for Juveniles
Held in Jail 10,000 10,000b
At-risk Supplemental Aid 3,504,995 3,504,995a
Contingency Reserve Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000e
5,581,777,996
5,580,924,384
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102 (5.4)(a)(II), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $1,334,183,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
d Of this amount, $1,010,525,540 $1,010,576,178 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $238,223,094 shall be
from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S. Of the amount appropriated from the State Education Fund, an estimated $213,273,564 is from the Kids
Matter Account created in the State Education Fund pursuant to Section 22-55-103 (6)(b), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from
the portion of the State Education Fund that is not the Kids Matter Account are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
e This amount shall be from the Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 22-54-117 (1)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART IV
(EDUCATION) $7,865,396,771 $4,587,560,682a $2,371,461,010b $56,340,311c $850,034,768d
$7,864,543,159 $2,370,607,398b
a Of this amount, $1,334,181,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $10,123,822 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $43,900,000 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
13 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, Extended High School -- Pursuant to Section 22-35-108.5 (2)(b)(III), C.R.S.,
the purpose of this footnote is to specify what portion of this appropriation is intended to be available for the Teacher Recruitment Education and Preparation
(TREP) Program for FY 2026-27. It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department of Education be authorized to utilize up to $2,680,250 $1,776,000
of this appropriation to fund qualified students identified as TREP Program participants. This amount is calculated based on an estimated 250 FTE TREP
Program participants funded at a rate of $10,721 $7,104 per FTE pursuant to Section 22-54-103.5 (8), C.R.S., and Section 22-54-104 (4.7), C.R.S.
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 19. Appropriation to the department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026. Amend as added by House Bill 26-1410 section 2, Part IV (3)(A),
the affected totals, and footnote 13 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART IV
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(3) SCHOOL DISTRICT OPERATIONS
(A) Public School Finance
Administration 2,645,074 2,380,153 264,921a
(17.1 FTE) (1.5 FTE)
Financial Transparency System
Maintenance 97,731 97,731a
(1.0 FTE)
School Finance Audit Payments 3,000,000 3,000,000b
State Share of Districts' Total
Program Funding 5,567,435,495 4,318,686,861c 1,248,748,634d
5,576,539,766 1,257,852,905d
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
Extended High School13 4,084,701 4,084,701a
3,181,892 3,181,892a
District Per Pupil
Reimbursements for Juveniles
Held in Jail 10,000 10,000b
At-risk Supplemental Aid 3,504,995 3,504,995a
Contingency Reserve Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000e
5,581,777,996
5,589,979,458
a These amounts shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State
Constitution, appropriations from the State Education Fund are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S., from federal mineral leasing revenues transferred to the State Public School Fund
pursuant to Sections 22-54-114 (1) and 34-63-102 (5.4)(a)(II), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $1,334,183,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $1,010,525,540 $1,019,629,811 shall be from the State Education Fund created in Section 17 (4)(a) of Article IX of the State Constitution and $238,223,094 shall be
from the State Public School Fund created in Section 22-54-114 (1), C.R.S. Of the amount appropriated from the State Education Fund, an estimated $213,273,564 is from the Kids
Matter Account created in the State Education Fund pursuant to Section 22-55-103 (6)(b), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 17 (3) of Article IX of the State Constitution, appropriations from
the portion of the State Education Fund that is not the Kids Matter Account are not subject to the limitation on fiscal year spending set forth in Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
$ $ $ $ $ $
e This amount shall be from the Contingency Reserve Fund created in Section 22-54-117 (1)(a), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART IV
(EDUCATION) $7,865,396,771 $4,587,560,682a $2,371,461,010b $56,340,311c $850,034,768d
$7,873,598,233 $2,379,662,472b
a Of this amount, $1,334,181,145 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $10,123,822 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $43,900,000 contains an (I) notation.
d This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
13 Department of Education, School District Operations, Public School Finance, Extended High School -- Pursuant to Section 22-35-108.5 (2)(b)(III), C.R.S.,
the purpose of this footnote is to specify what portion of this appropriation is intended to be available for the Teacher Recruitment Education and Preparation
(TREP) Program for FY 2026-27. It is the General Assembly's intent that the Department of Education be authorized to utilize up to $2,680,250 $1,776,000
of this appropriation to fund qualified students identified as TREP Program participants. This amount is calculated based on an estimated 250 FTE TREP
Program participants funded at a rate of $10,721 $7,104 per FTE pursuant to Section 22-54-103.5 (8), C.R.S., and Section 22-54-104 (4.7), C.R.S.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

SECTION 20. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided
in this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Sections 4 to 17 of this act take effect July 1, 2027.
(3) Section 18 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1410
becomes law and House Bill 26-1364 does not become law, in which case
section 18 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or House Bill
26-1410, whichever is later.
(4) Section 19 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1364
and House Bill 26-1410 become law in which case section 19 takes effect
upon the effective date of this act, House Bill 26-1364, or House Bill
26-1410, whichever is later.
SECTION 21. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1357

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1357